Utah statutes.
31A-33-103.5.   Powers of Fund -- Limitations.
(1)  The fund may form or acquire subsidiaries or enter into a joint
enterprise:
(a)  in accordance with Section 31A-33-107; and
       (b)  except as limited by this section and applicable insurance rules
and statutes.
(2)  Subject to applicable insurance rules and statutes, the fund may only
offer:
(a)  workers' compensation insurance in Utah;
(b)  workers' compensation insurance in a state other than Utah to the extent
necessary to:
(i)  accomplish its purpose under Subsection 31A-33-102(1)(b); and
(ii)  provide workers' compensation or occupational disease insurance coverage
to Utah employers and their employees engaged in interstate commerce; and
(c)  workers' compensation products and services in Utah or other states.
(3)  Subject to applicable insurance rules and statutes, a subsidiary of the
fund may:
(a)  offer workers' compensation insurance coverage only:
(i)  in a state other than Utah; and
(ii) (A)  to insure the following against liability for compensation based on
job-related accidental injuries and occupational diseases:
(I)  an employer, as defined in Section 34A-2-103, that has a majority of its
employees, as defined in Section 34A-2-104, hired or regularly employed in
Utah;
(II)  an employer, as defined in Section 34A-2-103, whose principal
administrative office is located in Utah;
(III)  a subsidiary or affiliate of an employer described in Subsection
(3)(a)(ii)(A)(I) or (II); or
(IV)  an employer, as defined in Section 34A-2-103, whose purchase of
insurance arises solely out of the purchase of workers' compensation products
and services from the fund or a fund subsidiary; or
(B)  for a state fund organization that is not an admitted insurer in the
other state:
(I)  on a fee for service basis; and
(II)  without bearing any insurance risk; and
(b)  offer workers' compensation products and services in Utah and other
states.
(4)  The fund shall write workers' compensation insurance in accordance with
Section 31A-22-1001.
(5) (a)  The fund may enter into a joint enterprise that offers workers'
compensation insurance and other coverage only in the state, provided:
(i)  the joint enterprise offers only property or liability insurance in
addition to workers' compensation insurance;
(ii)  the fund may not bear any insurance risk associated with the insurance
coverage other than risk associated with workers' compensation insurance; and
(iii)  the offer of other insurance shall be part of an insurance program that
includes workers' compensation insurance coverage that is provided by the
fund.
(b)  The fund or a subsidiary of the fund may not offer, or enter into a joint
enterprise that offers, or otherwise participate in the offering of accident
and health insurance.
